Maine, session 132, LD1760.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §1258, sub-§1, ¶C, as enacted by PL 1981, c. 693, §§5 and
8, is amended to read:
C. Secondary school facilities may be operated as 4-year schools, a 6-year school for
grades 7 to 12 or 2 or more 3-year schools, except that students living in an area remote
from a public school may be provided for under section 5204 5203.
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §1479, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2007, c. 240, Pt. XXXX,
§13, is amended to read:
1. Secondary school. A secondary school facility may be operated as a 4-year school,
as a 6-year school for grades 7 to 12 or as 2 or more 3-year schools, except that students
living in an area remote from a public school may be provided for under section 5204 5203.
Sec. 3. 20-A MRSA §5203, as amended by PL 2007, c. 668, §29, is further amended
to read:
§5203. Elementary students Student right to attend school in another administrative
unit
The following provisions govern the right of elementary students a student to attend
school in another school administrative unit other than the one in which they are that
student is resident.
1. Units with an elementary school. An elementary A student may attend an
approved private school or a public elementary or secondary school, including a contract
school under section 2701, in any school administrative unit with the consent of the
receiving school's school board. The student's parent or guardian, as long as there is
capacity in the receiving school. The school administrative unit where the student's parent
or guardian resides shall pay the cost of tuition and transportation. The receiving school
shall notify the superintendent of the school administrative unit where the student's parents
reside parent or guardian resides of the name and grade of the accepted student.
2. Living remote from public schools in a school administrative unit. Elementary
students A student whose parents live parent or guardian lives remote from a public school
in their that student's school administrative unit may, with the consent of the school board
in their unit, attend public school in an adjoining school administrative unit in Maine or a
neighboring state if the adjoining unit accepts tuition students has the capacity in the
receiving school and grade level to accept students. The school administrative unit where
the students' parents reside student's parent or guardian resides shall pay tuition and
transportation. The receiving school shall notify the superintendent of the school
administrative unit where the student's parent or guardian resides of the name and grade of
the accepted student.
3. Contract school. Students A student whose parents reside parent or guardian
resides in a school administrative unit which that contracts for school privileges under
section 2701 may attend the contract school. The school administrative unit in which their
parents reside the student's parent or guardian resides shall pay the costs of the contract and
transportation. The receiving contract school shall notify the superintendent of the school
administrative unit where the student's parent or guardian resides of the name and grade of
the accepted student.
Page 1 - 132LR1349(01)

4. Exception; no elementary school. A school administrative unit that neither
maintains an elementary a school nor contracts for elementary school privileges pursuant
to chapter 115 shall pay the tuition, in accordance with chapter 219, at the public school or
the approved private school of the parent's choice at which the student is accepted. The
receiving school shall notify the superintendent of the school administrative unit where the
student's parent or guardian resides of the name and grade of the accepted student.
5. Units with 10 or fewer students. Elementary students A student whose parents
reside parent or guardian resides in a school administrative unit with a total April 1st
resident student count of 10 or less may attend public school as a tuition students student
in a nearby school administrative unit. The school board of the nearby school
administrative unit shall accept the students student if requested by the school board of the
unit in which the students' parents reside student's parent or guardian. The school board
where the students' parents reside student's parent or guardian resides shall pay tuition and
transportation. The receiving school shall notify the superintendent of the school
administrative unit where the student's parent or guardian resides of the name and grade of
the accepted student.
Sec. 4. 20-A MRSA §5204, as amended by PL 2007, c. 668, §30, is repealed.
Sec. 5. 20-A MRSA §5205, sub-§6, as amended by PL 2015, c. 448, §10, is further
amended to read:
6. Transfer students. The Pursuant to section 5203, the following provisions apply
to student transfers of students from one school administrative unit to another school
administrative unit and from one school to another school within the same school
administrative unit.
A. Two superintendents may approve the transfer of a student from one school
administrative unit to another if:
(1) They find that a transfer is in the student's best interest; and
(2) The student's parent approves.
The superintendents shall notify the commissioner of any transfer approved under this
paragraph. If either of the superintendents decides not to approve the transfer, that
superintendent shall provide to the parent of the student requesting transfer under this
paragraph a written description of the basis of that superintendent's determination.
A-1. A request by a student's parent or guardian for a transfer from one school
administrative unit to another school administrative unit or from one school to another
school within the same school administrative unit must be approved by the receiving
school administrative unit or school, as long as there is sufficient capacity for
enrollment at the receiving school and grade level pursuant to paragraph C-1. If a
transfer request is denied, the receiving school administrative unit shall provide to the
student's parent or guardian a written description of the basis of that school
administrative unit's decision.
B. On the request of the parent of a student requesting transfer If a transfer request
under paragraph A A-1 is denied, the commissioner shall review the transfer. The
commissioner shall review the superintendents' receiving school administrative unit's
determinations and communicate with the superintendents receiving school
Page 2 - 132LR1349(01)

414 administrative unit and with the parent or guardian of the student prior to making a
425 decision. The commissioner may approve or disapprove the transfer and shall provide
436 to the parent or guardian of the student and to the superintendents receiving school
447 administrative unit a written decision describing the basis of the commissioner's
458 determination.
C. The superintendents shall annually review any transfer under this subsection.
C-1. A school administrative unit shall determine monthly the available capacity per
grade level in each of the school administrative unit's schools. The number of available
seats per grade level must be posted on each school's publicly accessible website by
the first day of each month. The capacity for each school must be measured by grade
level and may not be measured by program or special program capacity.
C-2. A transfer policy created by a school administrative unit may not discriminate
against any student on the basis of that student's residential address, ability, disability,
race, ethnicity, sex or socioeconomic status.
D. For purposes of the state school subsidy, a student transferred under this subsection
is considered a resident of the school administrative unit to which the student is
transferred. Upon request of the superintendent of schools in the unit in which a student
is placed in accordance with this subsection, the state share percentage for subsidized
educational costs for that student is equivalent to the state share percentage of the unit
in which the student's parent or legal guardian resides or the average state share
percentage, whichever is greater. If the parent or legal guardian does not reside in the
State or can not cannot be located, the subsidy is the state average subsidy.
D-1. Each school administrative unit shall adopt and implement a policy that allows
students to apply for transfer to another public school within the student's resident
school administrative unit or to a school in another school administrative unit. The
policy must outline the procedures for submitting a transfer request and the rights of
students under the policy. Each school administrative unit shall post the adopted
transfer policy prominently on its publicly accessible website.
E. A school administrative unit may not charge tuition for a transfer approved under
this subsection.
F. If dissatisfied with the commissioner's decision, a parent or guardian of a student
requesting transfer or either superintendent may, within 10 calendar days of the
commissioner's decision, request that the state board review the transfer. The state
board shall review the superintendents' school administrative units' determinations and
communicate with the commissioner, the superintendents school administrative units
and the parent or guardian of the student. The state board may approve or disapprove
the transfer. The state board shall make a decision within 45 calendar days of receiving
the request and shall provide to the parent or guardian of the student, the
superintendents school administrative units and the commissioner a written decision
describing the basis of the state board's determination. The state board's decision is
final and binding.
G. Notwithstanding paragraph D, if the commissioner or state board approves a
transfer under this subsection and the student subject to the transfer is receiving special
Page 3 - 132LR1349(01)

414 education services, the state subsidy of special education costs for the transferred
425 student may not be reduced as a result of the transfer.
A transfer under this subsection may not be made to a receiving school administrative unit
that does not operate a public school that includes the grade level of the student whose
parent or guardian requests the transfer, unless the superintendents of both the sending and
receiving school administrative units approve the transfer.
A school administrative unit shall notify the commissioner annually by July 1st of the
number of transfer applications, acceptances and denials and the reason for each denial.
The commissioner shall publish the data annually on the department's publicly accessible
website.
Sec. 6. 20-A MRSA §5205, sub-§6-A, as enacted by PL 2011, c. 651, §1, is
amended to read:
6-A. Interdistrict enrollment policies. The school School boards of 2 or more school
administrative units may adopt mutual policies allowing that wish to allow the transfer of
students, with parental or guardian approval, among the participating units. The must adopt
mutual policies must that set forth procedures and standards governing the transfers,
including but not limited to the school year or years in which the policy applies, application
procedures and standards of responsibility for transportation and special education. Each
school board adopting a policy under this subsection shall file a copy of the policy with the
department prior to the effective date of that policy and shall provide timely notice of the
policy to residents of the school administrative unit governed by that school board. For the
purposes of chapter 606‑B, a student transferred under this subsection is considered a
resident of the school administrative unit to which the student transferred.
Sec. 7. 20-A MRSA §5205, sub-§6-B, as amended by PL 2019, c. 219, §5, is
further amended to read:
6-B. Education service center enrollment policies. Members in an education service
center, as defined in section 3801, subsection 1, paragraph B, may shall adopt a mutual
policy allowing the transfer of students, with parental or guardian approval, among the
member school administrative units. The mutual policy must set forth procedures and
standards governing the transfers, including but not limited to the school year or years in
which the policy applies, application procedures and standards of responsibility for
transportation and special education. Each member school board that adopts the mutual
policy under this subsection shall post a copy of the mutual policy on the school
administrative unit's publicly accessible website and shall provide timely notice of the
policy to residents of the school administrative unit governed by that school board. For the
purposes of chapter 606‑B, a student transferred under this subsection is considered a
resident of the school administrative unit to which the student transferred.
Sec. 8. 20-A MRSA §5205, sub-§7, as amended by PL 2003, c. 477, §4, is further
amended to read:
7. Homeless students. Pursuant to section 261, the commissioner may shall adopt
rules to ensure that each homeless student has unrestricted access to the free public
education afforded by section 2, subsection 1. The rules must implement the requirements
and policies of the McKinney-Vento Homeless Education Assistance Improvement Act of
2001, 42 United States Code, Section 11431 et seq., and may be adopted as part of or in
Page 4 - 132LR1349(01)

415 conjunction with the required state plan. The rules must include, but are not limited to,
426 provisions for the resolution of disputes regarding the educational placement of homeless
437 students according to the best interest of homeless students, provisions that homeless
448 students receive services comparable to services offered to other students in the schools
459 they attend, provisions to address transportation and health records as a barrier to school
560 admission and other provisions required by United States Code, Title 42, Section 11431.